Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2646.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 7, to read: CHAPTER 7 CHILDREN'S RIGHTS ARTICLE 1. CHILDREN'S BILL OF RIGHTS START_STATUTE8-931. Children's bill of rights; fundamental rights; child's best interest; parental relationship; health care; education; definition A. A child's rights as provided in this section are fundamental rights and any law or rule that burdens a child's rights shall be in the child's best interest, shall be narrowly tailored to further a compelling government interest and shall include the consideration of the child's expressed interest.  A CHILD has the following fundamental rights: 1. To know and have a relationship with the child's parent or parents.  This right includes the right to visit and communicate with the child's parent or parents if the child's parent or parents are detained or incarcerated without the imposition of conditions that would unduly obstruct or limit the child's visitation and communication with the child's parent or parents. 2. To health care.  A child shall be considered competent to consent to the health care services prescribed in this paragraph whether or not the child is a minor and with or without the consent of the child's parent or parents.  A child shall have the right to health care that includes the right to request and receive confidential health care services relating to all of the following: (a) Contraception, pregnancy testing, prenatal care and other pregnancy-related care. (b) Prevention, diagnosis or treatment of sexually transmitted diseases. (c) Substance use disorders or mental illness. 3. To receive education at a public school.  NOtwithstanding a parent's right to direct the child's education, a child's right to an education includes the right of a child to express the desire to receive education at a public school and to be enrolled in a public school with the right to in-person instruction. B. For the purposes of this section, "parent": 1. means: (a) A natural or adoptive parent of a child. (b) A legal guardian of a CHILD or a person who is legally responsible for the child's welfare. (c) A person who is acting as the parent of a CHILD and with whom the child lives or has previously lived. 2. Does not include this state, if the child is in the care and custody of the department of CHILD safety. END_STATUTE